Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-112
Pioneers' Memorial Day.

The second Sunday in June in each year shall be Pioneers' Memorial Day, and shall be set apart for holding suitable exercises in the schools and churches of the state, and, when possible, in the cemeteries and over the graves of pioneers, in recognition of the men and women who served and sacrificed as pioneers in the settlement of Nebraska.

Laws 1913, c. 171, § 1, p. 523;

R.S.1913, § 7178;

C.S.1922, § 6829;

C.S.1929, § 82-113;

R.S.1943, § 82-112.